Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-985
Governmental entity; duties.

If a governmental entity elects to seek supplemental reimbursement pursuant to the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act on behalf of an eligible provider owned or operated by the entity, the governmental entity shall:

(1) Certify, in conformity with the requirements of 42 C.F.R. 433.51, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025, including any other applicable federal requirements, that the claimed expenditures for ground emergency medical transport services are eligible for federal financial participation;

(2) Provide evidence supporting the certification as specified by the department;

(3) Submit data as specified by the department to determine the appropriate amounts to claim as expenditures qualifying for federal financial participation; and

(4) Keep, maintain, and have readily retrievable any records specified by the department to fully disclose reimbursement amounts to which the eligible provider is entitled and any other records required by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

Laws 2017, LB578, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB380, § 3.